Utah statutes.
53A-24-104.   Appointment of executive director -- Administration of the
office.
(1)  The executive officer of the board shall appoint the executive director
of the office with the approval of the board.
(2)  The executive director shall administer the office in accordance with the
direction of the executive officer of the board, policies of the board, and
applicable state and federal laws and regulations.
